Arkansas, session 2025, HB1824.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Dog and Cat Rescue
Act: Daisy's Law".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 62, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-62-128. Law enforcement securing dogs and cats.
(a) In addition to the disposition of a dog or cat provided under § 5-
62-106, following a complaint of cruelty to dogs or cats under this
subchapter, a law enforcement officer may temporarily secure a dog or cat and
transfer temporary possession of the dog or cat to an appropriate place of
custody if a substantial likelihood exists that the condition of the dog or
cat would deteriorate if the dog or cat was not secured by the law
*CRH098*
03/17/2025 3:38:57 PM CRH098

HB1824
enforcement officer.
(b) A law enforcement officer may use the condition or the securing of
other dogs or cats belonging to the same owner as evidence to support
securing the dog or cat under subsection (a) of this section.
































03/17/2025 3:38:57 PM CRH098